Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-510
Stipend.

The department shall pay a stipend to qualified design-builders that submit responsive proposals but are not selected. Payment of the stipend shall give the department ownership of the intellectual property contained in the proposals and alternative technical concepts. The amount of the stipend shall be at the discretion of the department as disclosed in the request for proposals.

Laws 2023, LB565, § 10.